Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 4. Public Contracts in General.

§ 11-17.
Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 647.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to public contracts, see the Virginia Public Procurement Act, §

2.2-4300

et seq.

§ 11-17.1.
(Repealed) Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section expired by the terms of Acts 1980, c. 95, cl. 2, on July 1, 1983.

§§ 11-18 through 11-23.5.

Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 647.